District of Columbia statutes.
41-311

Prohibition on adoptive seizures.

Beginning October 1, 2018, the District shall not refer seized property to a federal agency seeking the adoption by the federal agency of the seized property. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the federal government, or any of its agencies, from seeking federal forfeiture.

History

June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 111, 62 DCR 1920